North Carolina, session 2025, SB1034.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of four million two hundred thousand dollars ($4,200,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to create and sustain local
judicially managed accountability and recovery courts authorized by Article 62 of Chapter 7A of
the General Statutes, including drug treatment courts and other local judicially managed
accountability and recovery courts exempted from the requirements of that Article pursuant to
G.S. 7A-802. The courts funded by this section shall primarily serve individuals diagnosed with
alcoholism or other substance use and dependency disorders that are defendants in the criminal
justice system. Among other functions, these courts shall recommend treatment plans for
individuals served by these courts and shall monitor the progress of the individuals receiving
treatment while the individuals remain under the jurisdiction of these courts.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of four million two hundred thousand dollars ($4,200,000) in
recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to facilitate the creation and
funding of new and existing local judicially managed accountability and recovery courts
authorized by Article 62 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, including drug treatment courts
and other local judicially managed accountability and recovery courts exempted from the
requirements of that Article pursuant to G.S. 7A-802. The courts funded by this section shall
primarily serve individuals that have a mental health diagnosis or treatment history and are
defendants in the criminal justice system. Among other functions, these courts shall recommend
mental health treatment plans for individuals served by these courts and shall monitor the
progress of the individuals receiving treatment while the individuals remain under the jurisdiction
of these courts.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S1034-v-1*